Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 15 Rhode Island Whistleblower Act [Repealed.]

36-15-1 — 36-15-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 648, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 157, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 5, 1995. For present similar provisions, see Chapter 50 of Title 28.